Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.522

Suicide prevention training modules—Construction industry.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the University of Washington's forefront suicide prevention center of excellence, in coordination with associations representing the construction industry, shall develop:

(a) An online, interactive training module in suicide prevention; and

(b) A series of modules intended to be delivered by the construction industry that complement the online training module, which must include training on available resources, lethal means safety, screening tools, men's mental health, and a refresher on the online training.

(2) The University of Washington's forefront suicide prevention center of excellence shall complete the modules developed under subsection (1) of this section by July 1, 2021.

[ 2020 c 229 s 3.]